Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3320
Legal service insurance corporation; laws applicable.

All corporations organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall be governed by such other laws regulating the business of insurance and profit and nonprofit corporations as do not conflict with sections 44-3301 to 44-3327.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 20.